Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Chapter 3. Uniform Simultaneous Death Law

§ 91-3-1.
How chapter cited.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Simultaneous Death Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 479-08; Laws, 1956, ch. 214, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1956.

§ 91-3-3.
Construction.

This chapter shall be so construed and interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law in those states which enact the Uniform Simultaneous Death Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 479-07; Laws, 1956, ch. 214, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1956.

§ 91-3-5.
Disposition of property in absence of evidence of survivorship.

Where the title to property or the devolution thereof depends upon priority of death and there is no sufficient evidence that the persons have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property of each person shall be disposed of as if he had survived, except as provided otherwise in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 479-01; Laws, 1956, ch. 214, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1956.

§ 91-3-7.
Beneficiaries of another person’s disposition of property.

Where two (2) or more beneficiaries are designated to take successively by reason of survivorship under another person’s disposition of property and there is no sufficient evidence that these beneficiaries have died otherwise than simultaneously, the property thus disposed of shall be divided into as many equal portions as there are successive beneficiaries and these portions shall be distributed respectively to those who would have taken in the event that each designated beneficiary had survived.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 479-02; Laws, 1956, ch. 214, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1956.

§ 91-3-9.
Joint tenants or tenants by the entirety.

Where there is no sufficient evidence that two (2) joint tenants have died otherwise than simultaneously the property so held shall be distributed one half (1/2) as if one had survived and one half (1/2) as if the other had survived. If there are more than two (2) joint tenants and all of them have so died the property thus distributed shall be in the proportion that one bears to the whole number of joint tenants.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 479-03; Laws, 1956, ch. 214, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1956.

§ 91-3-11.
Insurance policies or contracts.

Where the insured and the beneficiary in a policy of life or accident insurance have died and there is insufficient evidence that they have died otherwise than simultaneously, the proceeds of the policy shall be distributed as if the insured had survived the beneficiary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 479-04; Laws, 1956, ch. 214, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1956.

§ 91-3-13.
Chapter not to apply to persons dying before effective date.

This chapter shall not apply to the distribution of the property of a person who has died before July 1, 1956.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 479-05; Laws, 1956, ch. 214, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1956.

§ 91-3-15.
Provision in will, etc., rendering chapter inapplicable.

This chapter shall not apply in the case of wills, living trusts, deeds, contracts of insurance or other contracts wherein provision has been made for distribution of property different from the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 479-06; Laws, 1956, ch. 214, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1956.